District of Columbia statutes.
28-4804.10

Liquidating asset.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration. The term “liquidating asset” includes a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance. The term “liquidating asset” does not include a payment subject to § 28-4804.09, resources subject to § 28-4804.11, timber subject to § 28-4804.12, an activity subject to § 28-4804.14, an asset subject to § 28-4804.15, or any asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under § 28-4805.03.

(b)

A trustee shall allocate to income 10 percent of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the balance to principal.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 502(c), 48 DCR 2087
This section is referenced in § 28-4804.06, § 28-4804.08, and § 28-4804.09.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 410 of the Uniform Principal and Income Act (1997 Act).